Georgia statutes. TITLE 4 Animals
Cross references.

Criminal penalty for livestock theft, §

16-8-20

.

Criminal penalty for removal of collars or identifying items or marks on animals, §

16-9-71

.

Cruelty to animals, §

16-12-4

.

Protection of endangered species of wildlife, §

27-3-130

et seq.

Regulation of importation, sale, etc., of animals and birds to be kept as pets, § 31-12-9.

Control of rabies, T. 31, C. 19.

Veterinarians and registered animal technicians generally, T. 43, C. 50.

Liability of owner or keeper of vicious or dangerous animal for injuries caused by animal, § 51-2-7.

Law reviews.

For note, “Feeling the Heat: The Endangered Species Act and Climate Change,” see 36 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 437 (2020).

For note, “No Pets Allowed:
The Need to Address Increasing Abuses of Assistance Animal Regulations Under Federal Law,” see 36 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 939 (2020).